Massachusetts, session 194th, S1875.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Clause (h) of subsection 1 of section 4 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in
the 2012 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after “system;”, in line 156, the
following words:- “, provided further that a veteran who has creditable service as a fire fighter
or police officer may purchase creditable service for active services in the armed forces of the
United States at the same rate as a fire fighter or police officer pursuant to this section;"
of 1